Colorado, session 2026A, HB1119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado faces a severe housing shortage, with the state
estimated to have a housing deficit of more than one hundred six
thousand units according to the state demographer's office at the
department of local affairs;
(b) More than one in three Colorado households are
cost-burdened, spending more than thirty percent of their income on
housing, and more than half of Colorado's renter households are
cost-burdened, while nearly ninety percent of Colorado's extremely
-2- HB26-1119

low-income rental households are cost-burdened;
(c) The median monthly home mortgage payment in Colorado
increased by seventy-one percent between 2017 and 2023 according to the
Colorado housing and finance authority;
(d) Rising land costs are a significant driver of housing
unaffordability in Colorado, with land values rising from thirty-one
percent of Colorado home values in 2012 to fifty-eight percent in 2024,
according to the American Enterprise Institute;
(e) High land costs create significant barriers to housing
development, as developers struggle to make projects financially viable
when the improvements they make to the property incur a larger property
tax liability;
(f) Creating a partial building exemption will reduce this barrier
to housing, making it easier to build and finance new housing
development;
(g) The value of land is determined primarily by its location and
the amenities and services surrounding it-factors created by the
community-rather than by any ingenuity, investment, or initiative of the
landowner, whereas the value of buildings reflects productive investments
made by property owners;
(h) When governments invest in public services and amenities like
transit, parks, and schools, the resulting increase to nearby land values is
captured by private landowners rather than reinvested for the public
benefit, creating windfall wealth increases for landowners, whose
contributions to such improvements are substantially outweighed by the
increased cost of housing for workers and families;
(i) While a shift towards a property tax system where all buildings
-3- HB26-1119

and improvements are exempt and only land is taxed is administratively
and politically unrealistic in the short-term, one simple step in that
direction is allowing local taxing entities to choose to "split" their mill
levies so that a lower mill levy rate is imposed on buildings compared to
unimproved land;
(j) Split-rate property taxation, which taxes land at a higher rate
while providing partial "exemptions", provides economic incentives for
productive investment and real estate development while disincentivizing
land speculation and combating blight, because owners of vacant and
underutilized land face higher tax burdens relative to owners who put
their property to productive use;
(k) Split-rate property taxation incentivizes more efficient land
use and development patterns by encouraging construction on vacant lots,
infill development, and higher-density construction in areas with existing
infrastructure, thereby reducing urban sprawl, lowering per-unit land
costs, and minimizing environmental impacts associated with
development on the urban fringe;
(l) Research and experience from jurisdictions that have
implemented split-rate property taxation demonstrate that this policy can
meaningfully boost housing construction while simultaneously reducing
tax burdens for the majority of property owners who have invested in
improving their land;
(m) The United States has more than a century of experience with
split-rate property taxation, with split-rate taxation previously the law in
Hawaii, as well as twenty-three jurisdictions in Pennsylvania having
implemented such systems since 1913, and sixteen Pennsylvania cities
currently using split-rate taxation, providing substantial empirical
-4- HB26-1119

evidence of its effects;
(n) The city of Harrisburg, Pennsylvania, which adopted split-rate
taxation in 1975 and gradually increased the tax differential between land
and buildings, experienced a transformation from one of the most
distressed cities in the United States to a thriving community, with an
eighty-five percent reduction in vacant structures over twenty years, a
seven-fold increase in taxable real estate value, and between eighty and
ninety percent of property owners paying less under the split-rate taxation
system than they would have paid under a single, uniform property tax
rate;
(o) The city of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, which adopted split-rate
property taxation in 1913, experienced a seventy percent increase in
building permits following an increase in their land-to-building tax
differential in the 1980s, during a period in which comparable peer cities
experienced a fourteen percent decline in building activity;
(p) Split-rate municipalities in Pennsylvania have experienced
significantly higher construction activity than comparable single, uniform
property tax rate cities, according to a 2000 study published in the Journal
of Urban Economics;
(q) A 2010 study published in the Journal of Urban Economics
found that split-rate property tax jurisdictions experienced five additional
percentage points of housing growth compared to single, uniform
property tax rate jurisdictions, with the increase occurring through infill
developments rather than sprawl, leading the researchers to characterize
split-rate property tax as "a potentially powerful anti-sprawl tool";
(r) Split-rate property taxation can have a significantly positive
impact on aggregate market property values, with a 2022 study published
-5- HB26-1119

in the Public Finance Review finding that it can increase aggregate
residential property value by twelve percent and commercial property
value by twenty percent;
(s) Economist Joseph Stiglitz has demonstrated that higher land
taxes are correlated with higher economic growth rates because such
taxes discourage land speculation that diverts investment from productive
economic activities;
(t) Split-rate property taxation is supported by a broad range of
economists across the political spectrum because of its efficiency,
neutrality, and lack of economic distortions, beginning with Adam Smith
and including Nobel laureates Milton Friedman, Paul Krugman, and
Joseph Stiglitz;
(u) Colorado county assessors already assess land values and
improvement values separately on property tax records;
(v) Colorado already operates a form of split-rate property
taxation, as the assessment rates for school district property taxes differ
from the assessment rates for other local government taxes; and
(w) Allowing local governments and certain special districts to
choose to adopt split-rate property taxation or building exemptions
supports and reinforces recent state and local actions to address the
housing supply and affordability crisis, including efforts to encourage
transit-oriented development, accessory dwelling units, infill
development, and smart growth strategies, all of which seek to promote
more efficient use of land within existing communities and urban centers.
(2) Therefore, by enacting this House Bill , the general
assembly intends to provide municipalities, counties, and certain special
districts with the freedom to choose to split their mill levies and create
-6- HB26-1119

"building exemptions" so that a lower rate is levied on buildings and
improvements compared to the land without improvements, consistent
with section 20 of article X of the state constitution, to encourage housing
production, discourage land speculation, promote efficient land use, and
reduce tax burdens on property owners who productively improve and
develop their land.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 29-1-306 as
follows:
29-1-306. Split mill levy - different mill levy rates for land and
improvements to land - limitations - requirements - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY" MEANS THE SUBCLASS OF
NONRESIDENTIAL PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-1-104 (1.6)(c).
(b) "CONSERVATION EASEMENT PROPERTY" MEANS PROPERTY
SUBJECT TO A PERPETUAL CONSERVATION EASEMENT.
(c) "IMPROVEMENTS" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
39-1-102 (6.3).
(d) "LOCAL TAXING ENTITY" MEANS ANY COUNTY, CITY AND
COUNTY, CITY, TOWN, METROPOLITAN DISTRICT, BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICT, LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT, PUBLIC IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICT, SPECIAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT, DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY, URBAN RENEWAL AUTHORITY, OR COUNTY REVITALIZATION
AREA AUTHORIZED TO LEVY PROPERTY TAXES.
(e) "MINING PROPERTY" MEANS PRODUCING MINES AND
NONPRODUCING MINING CLAIMS VALUED FOR ASSESSMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 6 OF TITLE 39.
-7- HB26-1119

(f) "OIL AND GAS PROPERTY" MEANS LEASEHOLDS AND LANDS
PRODUCING OIL OR GAS VALUED FOR ASSESSMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ARTICLE 7 OF TITLE 39.
(g) "PERPETUAL CONSERVATION EASEMENT" HAS THE MEANING
SET FORTH IN SECTION 39-1-102 (8.7).
(h) "RENEWABLE ENERGY PRODUCTION PROPERTY" MEANS THE
SUBCLASS OF NONRESIDENTIAL PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN SECTION 39-1-104
(1.6)(b).
(i) "STATE-ASSESSED PROPERTY" MEANS THE PROPERTY REQUIRED
TO BE VALUED BY THE PROPERTY TAX ADMINISTRATOR PURSUANT TO
SECTION 39-2-109 (1)(a).
(2) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LAW TO THE CONTRARY, EXCEPT
AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION, FOR PROPERTY TAX
YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE GOVERNING
BODY OF A LOCAL TAXING ENTITY MAY, BY ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION,
IMPOSE PROPERTY TAXES ON THE ASSESSED VALUE OF LAND AND THE
ASSESSED VALUE OF IMPROVEMENTS THEREON AT DIFFERENT MILL LEVY
RATES, PROVIDED THAT THE MILL LEVY RATE IMPOSED BY THE LOCAL
TAXING ENTITY FOR THE IMPROVEMENTS IS LESS THAN OR EQUAL TO THE
MILL LEVY RATE IMPOSED BY THE LOCAL TAXING ENTITY FOR THE LAND.
(b) A LOCAL TAXING ENTITY SHALL NOT IMPOSE PROPERTY TAXES
ON THE ASSESSED VALUE OF LAND AND THE ASSESSED VALUE OF
IMPROVEMENTS THEREON AT DIFFERENT MILL LEVY RATES PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION FOR AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY,
CONSERVATION EASEMENT PROPERTY, MINING PROPERTY, OIL AND GAS
PROPERTY, RENEWABLE ENERGY PRODUCTION PROPERTY, OR
STATE-ASSESSED PROPERTY.
-8- HB26-1119

(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ALLOWS A LOCAL TAXING ENTITY TO
IMPOSE PROPERTY TAXES ON THE ASSESSED VALUE OF LAND AND THE
ASSESSED VALUE OF IMPROVEMENTS THEREON AT DIFFERENT MILL LEVY
RATES IN A MANNER THAT IS NOT CONSISTENT WITH SECTION 20 OF
ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR ANY STATUTORY LIMITATION
ON THE LOCAL TAXING ENTITY'S MILL LEVY RATES OR TOTAL PROPERTY
TAX REVENUE.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-1-111, amend (2)
as follows:
39-1-111. Taxes levied by board of county commissioners.
(2) (a) As soon as such levies have been made, the board of
county commissioners, or other body authorized by law to levy taxes, or
either group's authorized party shall forthwith certify all such levies to the
assessor, upon forms prescribed by the administrator, and shall transmit
a copy of such certification to the administrator, to the division of local
government, and to the department of education.
(b) A BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OR OTHER BODY
REQUIRED TO CERTIFY ALL LEVIES TO THE ASSESSOR PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE WITH ITS CERTICATION
THE CERTIFIED LEVY OF ANY LOCAL TAXING ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 29-1-306, THAT IMPOSES PROPERTY TAXES ON THE ASSESSED
VALUE OF LAND AND THE ASSESSED VALUE OF IMPROVEMENTS THEREON
AT DIFFERENT MILL LEVY RATES PURSUANT TO SECTION 29-1-306 (2)(a)
AND IS REQUIRED BY SECTION 39-5-128 (4) TO INCLUDE IN ITS
CERTIFICATION EACH MILL LEVY RATE FOR LAND AND IMPROVEMENTS
THEREON IMPOSED BY SUCH LOCAL TAXING ENTITY.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-1-125, amend
-9- HB26-1119

(1)(a)(I) as follows:
39-1-125. Tax and levy rate information publicly available.
(1) (a) When each town, city, school district, special district, or
other taxing authority certifies its levy pursuant to section 39-5-128, it
shall also provide the following information for each levy that it imposes:
(I) The rate of the levy, INCLUDING THE DIFFERENT RATES FOR
LAND AND IMPROVEMENTS THEREON, IF APPLICABLE;
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-5-128, add (4) as
follows:
39-5-128. Certification of valuation for assessment.
(4) A LOCAL TAXING ENTITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 29-1-306 (1),
THAT IMPOSES PROPERTY TAXES ON THE ASSESSED VALUE OF LAND AND
THE ASSESSED VALUE OF IMPROVEMENTS THEREON AT DIFFERENT MILL
LEVY RATES PURSUANT TO SECTION 29-1-306 (2)(a) SHALL INCLUDE IN ITS
CERTIFICATION EACH MILL LEVY RATE FOR LAND AND THE IMPROVEMENTS
THEREON IMPOSED BY THE LOCAL TAXING ENTITY.
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-10- HB26-1119